Connecticut, session 2026, SB00055.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the general statutes be amended to dedicate the revenue
generated from the additional one per cent of sales tax on meals as
follows: (1) Fifty per cent of the amount collected to be deposited in the
Tourism Fund; (2) twenty-five per cent of the amount collected to be
paid to the municipalities to which the purchases of the meals are
sourced; and (3) twenty-five per cent of the amount collected to be
deposited in the General Fund and dedicated to funding free school
lunches.